California statutes. Elections Code
(4) Obstruct ingress, egress, or parking.

(b) The activities described in subdivision (a) are prohibited within 100 feet of either of the following:

(1) The entrance to a building that contains a polling place as defined by Section 338.5, an elections official’s office, or a satellite location.

(2) An outdoor site, including a curbside voting area, at which a voter may cast or drop off a ballot.

(c) A person shall not, with the intent of dissuading another person from voting, do any of the following within the immediate vicinity of a voter in line to cast a ballot or drop off a ballot:

(1) Solicit a vote.

(2) Speak to a voter about marking the voter’s ballot.

(3) Disseminate visible or audible electioneering information.

(d) A violation of this section is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than 12 months, or in state prison. Any person who conspires to violate this section is guilty of a felony.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 296, Sec. 8.   (AB 1249)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

18542.

Every employer, whether a corporation or natural person, or any other person who employs, is guilty of a misdemeanor if, in paying his or her employees the salary or wages due them, encloses their pay in pay envelopes upon which or in which there is written or printed the name of any candidate or any political mottoes, devices, or arguments containing threats, express or implied, intended or calculated to influence the political opinions or actions of the employees.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

18543.

(a) Every person who knowingly challenges a person’s right to vote without probable cause or on fraudulent or spurious grounds, or who engages in mass, indiscriminate, and groundless challenging of voters solely for the purpose of preventing voters from voting or to delay the process of voting, or who fraudulently advises any person that he or she is not eligible to vote or is not registered to vote when in fact that person is eligible or is registered, or who violates Section 14240, is punishable by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than 12 months or in the state prison.

(b) Every person who conspires to violate subdivision (a) is guilty of a felony.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

18544.

(a) Any person in possession of a firearm or any uniformed peace officer, private guard, or security personnel or any person who is wearing a uniform of a peace officer, guard, or security personnel, who is stationed in the immediate vicinity of, or posted at, a polling place
 is punishable by a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for 16 months or two or three years, or in a county jail not exceeding one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(b) This section does not apply to any of the following:

(1) An unarmed uniformed guard or security personnel who is at the polling place to cast their vote.

(2) A peace officer who is conducting official business in the course of their public employment or who is at the polling place to cast their vote.

(3) A private guard or security personnel hired or arranged for by a city
 or county elections official.

(4) A private guard or security personnel hired or arranged for by the owner or manager of the facility or property in which the polling place is located if the guard or security personnel is not hired or arranged solely for the day on which an election is held.

(5) (A) A person described in subdivision (a) who is stationed in the immediate vicinity of, or posted at, a polling place with the written authorization of the appropriate city or county elections official, provided that neither the Secretary of State nor the Attorney General objected to that authorization, in writing, after it was granted.

(B) A person described in subdivision (a) who is stationed or posted
 at a polling place with written authorization pursuant to subparagraph (A), which is subsequently objected to by the Secretary of State or Attorney General, shall not be subject to criminal penalties pursuant to this section unless the person remained stationed or posted at the polling place after gaining knowledge of the objection.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 10, Sec. 6.   (SB 73)   Effective May 27, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

18545.

(a) Any person who hires or arranges for any other person in possession of a firearm or any uniformed law enforcement officer, private guard, or security personnel or any person who is wearing a uniform of a law enforcement officer, private guard, or security personnel, to be stationed in the immediate vicinity of, or posted at, a polling place or a county elections office, is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail for a period not to exceed one year, by a fine not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment,
 or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code and by a fine not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(b) This section does not apply to any of the following:

(1) The owner or manager of the facility or property in which the polling place is located if the private guard or security personnel is not hired or arranged solely for the day on which the election is held.

(2) A person who hires or arranges for another person described in subdivision (a) to be stationed in the immediate vicinity of, or posted at, a polling place or a county elections office pursuant to a court order.

(3) (A) A
 person who hires or arranges for another person described in subdivision (a) to be stationed in the immediate vicinity of, or posted at, a polling place or a county elections office with the written authorization of the appropriate elections official, provided that neither the Secretary of State nor the Attorney General objected to that authorization, in writing, after it was granted.

(B) A person who hires or arranges for another person described in subdivision (a) to be stationed or posted at a polling place or county elections office with written authorization pursuant to subparagraph (A), which is subsequently objected to by the Secretary of State or Attorney General, shall not be subject to criminal penalties pursuant to this section, unless they have knowledge of the objection, and after gaining such knowledge, permits the person
 they hired or arranged for to remain stationed or posted at the polling place or elections office.

(c) For purposes of this section, “law enforcement officer” means either of the following:

(1) A peace officer as defined in Section 830 of the Penal Code.

(2) An officer or agent of a federal law enforcement agency or any person acting on behalf of a federal law enforcement agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 10, Sec. 7.   (SB 73)   Effective May 27, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

18546.

As used in this article:

(a) “Elections official” means the county elections official, registrar of voters, or city clerk.

(b) “Immediate vicinity” means the area within a distance of 100 feet from the room or rooms in which the voters are signing the roster and casting ballots.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

18547.

(a) In addition to any other fine or penalty imposed by this article, the court may order any person convicted of violating this article to pay a restitution fine, the amount of which shall be determined by the court and be commensurate with the seriousness of the offense.

(b) The moneys derived from the fine assessed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be deposited in the Voter Intimidation Restitution Fund, created in Section 18548.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 491, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

18548.

The Voter Intimidation Restitution Fund is hereby established in the State Treasury. Upon appropriation by the Legislature, moneys in the fund shall be allocated to the Secretary of State to be used in voter education campaigns addressing the specific crime committed by anyone convicted of violating this article. The funds shall also be used for the administrative costs associated with distribution of the fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 491, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Corruption of Voting [18560. - 18579.]

18560.

Every person is guilty of a crime punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for 16 months or two or three years, or in a county jail not exceeding one year, who:

(a) Not being entitled to vote at an election, fraudulently votes or fraudulently attempts to vote at that election.

(b) Being entitled to vote at an election, votes more than once, attempts to vote more than once, or knowingly hands in two or more ballots folded together at that election.

(c) Impersonates or attempts to impersonate a voter at an
 election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 80.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

18560.1.

(a) A person who votes or attempts to vote in an election held in this state and in an election held in another state on the same date shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) This section does not prohibit a voter from voting in an election held in this state and in an election held in another state on the same date if one of the elections is an election in a landowner voting district or any other district for which an elector is not required to be a resident of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 692, Sec. 1.   (AB 1539)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

18561.

Every person is punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for 16 months or two or three years who:

(a) Procures, assists, counsels, or advises another to give or offer his vote at any election, knowing that the person is not qualified to vote.

(b) Aids or abets in the commission of any of the offenses mentioned in Section 18560.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 81.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

18562.

Every member of a precinct board is guilty of a misdemeanor who, prior to putting the ballot of a voter in the ballot box, commits any of the following:

(a) Attempts to find out any name on the ballot.

(b) Opens or suffers to be opened or examined the folded ballot of any voter which has been handed in.

(c) Makes or places any mark or device on any folded ballot with a view to ascertaining the name of any person for whom the voter has voted.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

18562.5.

(a) A member of the public is guilty of a misdemeanor if, while observing any of the following, he or she willfully engages in any conduct set forth in subdivision (b):

(1) The processing of vote by mail ballots conducted pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 15100) of Division 15.

(2) The semifinal official canvass conducted pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 15150) of Division 15.

(3) The official canvass conducted pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 15300) of Division 15.

(4) A recount conducted pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 15600) of Division 15.

(b) (1) Attempting to ascertain the identity and ballot choices of a voter, or having
 observed or learned the identity of a voter, attempting to ascertain the ballot choices of that voter.

(2) Opening a provisional or vote by mail ballot envelope containing a voted ballot in order to ascertain the voter’s ballot choices.

(3) Making or placing a mark or device on a ballot or secrecy envelope in an attempt to ascertain the voter’s ballot choices.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 94, Sec. 1.   (AB 269)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

18563.

Every member of a precinct board is guilty of a misdemeanor who, without the consent of a voter, discloses the name of any candidate the board member has discovered in his capacity as a member of the board to have been voted for by the voter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

18564.

(a) Any person is guilty of a felony, punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for two, three, or four years who, before or during an election:

(1) Tampers with, interferes with, or attempts to interfere with, the correct operation of, or willfully damages in order to prevent the use of, any voting machine, voting device, voting system, vote tabulating device, or ballot tally software program source codes.

(2) (A) Interferes or attempts to interfere with the secrecy of voting or ballot tally software program source codes.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, “interferes or attempts to interfere with” includes knowingly, and without authorization, providing unauthorized access to, or breaking the chain of custody to, either of the following:

(i) Certified voting technology during the lifecycle of that certified voting technology.

(ii) Any finished or unfinished ballot cards.

(3) Knowingly, and without authorization, makes or has in the person’s possession credentials, passwords, or access keys to a voting machine that has been adopted and will be used in elections in this state.

(4) Willfully substitutes or attempts to substitute forged or counterfeit ballot tally
 software program source codes.

(b) The definitions in Section 17600 apply for purposes of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 605, Sec. 11.   (SB 1328)   Effective September 25, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

18564.5.

(a) The Secretary of State, Attorney General, and any local elections official in the county in which the act occurs, may bring a civil action against an individual, business, or other legal entity that commits any of the following acts before, during, or after an election:

(1) Tampers, interferes, or attempts to interfere with the correct operation of, or willfully damages in order to prevent the use of, any voting machine, voting device, voting system, vote tabulating device, or ballot tally software.

(2) Interferes or attempts to interfere with the secrecy of voting or interferes or attempts to interfere with ballot
 tally software program source codes.

(3) Knowingly, and without authorization, gains access to or provides another person or persons with access to a voting machine for the purpose of committing one of the acts specified by this section.

(4) Willfully substitutes or attempts to substitute forged, counterfeit, or malicious ballot tally software program source codes.

(5) Knowingly, and without authorization, inserts or causes the insertion of uncertified hardware, software, or firmware, for whatever purpose, into any voting machine, voting device, voting system, vote tabulating device, or ballot tally software.

(6) Fails to notify the Secretary of State
 prior to any change in hardware, software, or firmware to a voting machine, voting device, voting system, or vote tabulating device, certified or conditionally certified for use in this state.

(7) Takes
 any document, record, certified voting technology, or electronic data, as those terms are defined in Section 17600, or portions thereof including source code, or any other election-related material or equipment necessary to the conduct of an election, from the custody of the elections official in violation of subdivision (d) of Section 15551.

(b) A civil action may be brought pursuant to this section for a civil penalty not to exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for each act and for injunctive relief, if appropriate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 341, Sec. 5.   (SB 1418)   Effective September 19, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

18565.

Any person who aids or abets in the commission of any of the offenses described in Section 18564 is punishable by imprisonment in the county jail for a period of six months or in the state prison for 16 months or two or three years.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

18566.

Every person is punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for two, three, or four years who:

(a) Forges or counterfeits returns of an election purported to have been held at a precinct where no election was in fact held.

(b) Willfully substitutes forged or counterfeit returns of election in the place of true returns for a precinct where an election was actually held.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 83.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

18567.

Every person who willfully adds to or subtracts from the votes actually cast at an election, in any official or unofficial returns, or who alters the returns, is punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for 16 months or two or three years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 84.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

18568.

Every person is punishable by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for 16 months or two or three years, or by both that fine and imprisonment, who:

(a) Aids in changing or destroying any poll list or official ballot.

(b) Aids in wrongfully placing any ballots in the ballot container or in taking any therefrom.

(c) Adds or attempts to add any ballots to those legally polled at any election by fraudulently putting them into the ballot container, either before or after the ballots therein have been counted.

(d) Adds to or mixes with, or attempts to add to or mix with, the ballots polled, any other ballots, while they are being counted or canvassed or at any other time, with intent to change the result of the election, or allows another to do so, when in the person’s power to prevent it.

(e) Carries away or destroys, attempts to carry away or destroy, or knowingly allows another to carry away or destroy, any poll list, ballot container, or ballots lawfully polled or who willfully detains, mutilates, or destroys any election returns.

(f) Removes any unvoted ballots from the polling place before the completion of the ballot count.

(g) Displays a container or
 provides an envelope for the purpose of collecting or returning ballots, with the intent to deceive a voter into casting a ballot in an unofficial ballot or returning a ballot in an unofficial ballot return envelope. Evidence of intent to deceive may include using the word “official” on the container or envelope, or otherwise fashioning the container or envelope in a way that is likely to deceive a voter into believing that the container or envelope is an official collection box or official ballot return envelope that has been approved by an elections official.

(h) Directs or solicits a voter to place a ballot in a container or envelope prohibited by subdivision (g).

(i) Knowingly takes any document, record,
 certified voting technology, or electronic data, as those terms are defined in Section 17600, or portions thereof including source code, or any other election-related material or equipment necessary to the conduct of an election, from the custody of the elections official in violation of subdivision (d) of Section 15551.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 341, Sec. 6.   (SB 1418)   Effective September 19, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

18569.

Every person who aids or abets in the commission of any of the offenses mentioned in Section 18566, 18567, or 18568 is punishable by imprisonment in the county jail for the period of six months or in the state prison for 16 months or two or three years.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

18570.

Every person is guilty of a misdemeanor who does any one of the following:

(a) Removes or defaces any posted copy of the results of votes cast within the period of 48 hours from the official time fixed for the closing of the polls.

(b) Delays delivery of or changes the copy of the result of votes cast that is to be delivered to the city or county elections official.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

18571.

Any person acting on any counting board who refuses to obey any lawful order of the county elections official or his or her deputy is guilty of a misdemeanor, unless he or she is by his or her refusal guilty of a higher crime under the laws of this state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

18572.

Each counting board and its members are subject to the liabilities and penalties to which precinct boards or their members are subject where the votes and returns are counted at the precincts where they were polled.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

18573.

Every person is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for 16 months or two or three years who furnishes any voter wishing to vote, who cannot read, with a ballot, informing or giving that voter to understand that it contains a name written or printed thereon different from the name which is written or printed thereon, or defrauds any voter at any election by deceiving and causing him or her to vote for a different person for any office than he or she intended or desired to vote for.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 86.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

18573.5.

(a) It is a misdemeanor for a person who is providing care or direct supervision to an elder in a state-licensed or state-subsidized facility or program to coerce or deceive the elder into voting for or against a candidate or measure contrary to the elder’s intent or in the absence of any intent of the elder to cast a vote for or against that candidate or measure.

(b) For purposes of this section, “elder” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 15610.27 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(c) A violation of this section is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed six months or by a fine not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per ballot containing a vote cast by the elder as a result of the coercion or deception or by both that imprisonment and fine.

(d) Nothing in this section shall preclude prosecution under any other provision.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 260, Sec. 1.   (AB 547)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

18574.

Every person who, after being required by the precinct board at an election, refuses to be sworn or, being sworn, refuses to answer any pertinent questions propounded by the board touching the right of another to vote, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

18575.

Every person is guilty of a felony, and on conviction shall be punished by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for two, three or four years, who at any election:

(a) Without first having been appointed and qualified, acts as an election officer.

(b) Not being an election officer, performs or discharges any of the duties of an election officer in regard to the handling, counting, or canvassing of any ballots.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 87.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

18577.

(a) Any person having charge of a completed vote by mail ballot who willfully interferes or causes interference with its return to the local elections official having jurisdiction over the election is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding six months, by a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both the fine and imprisonment.

(b) Any person having charge of a vote by mail ballot who willfully interferes or causes interference with its delivery to a voter is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in
 the county jail not exceeding six months, by a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both the fine and imprisonment.

(c) Any person with authority who directs one or more other persons subject to their supervision or authority to engage in the conduct prohibited by subdivision (a) or (b) is guilty of a felony, punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for two, three, or four years.

(d) For purposes of this section, “interference” includes, but is not limited to, providing unauthorized access to, breaking the chain of custody for, or tampering with a vote by mail ballot, or, having been designated to return a ballot under Section 3017, failing to return that ballot to the applicable elections official.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 331, Sec. 1.   (SB 259)   Effective September 19, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

18578.

Any person who applies for, or who votes or attempts to vote, a vote by mail ballot by fraudulently signing the name of a fictitious person, or of a regularly qualified voter, or of a person who is not qualified to vote, is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for 16 months or two or three years, by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 88.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

18579.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, any person who seizes or causes or assists in the seizure of ballots, election records, or certified voting technology or any portion thereof, before election results are certified pursuant to Section 15372, is guilty of a felony, punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for 16 months or 2 or 3 years.

(b) Any person with authority who directs one or more other persons subject to their supervision or authority to engage in the conduct prohibited by subdivision (a) shall be guilty of a felony, punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for two, three, or four years.

(c) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Seize” and “seizure” mean the removal from the custody and control of authorized elections officials, as specified in subdivision (d) of Section 15551, except as provided by Sections 15553 and 19230.

(2) “Certified voting technology” has the same meaning as defined in Section 17600.

(3) “Election record” means any document or record that is or will be subject to the preservation requirements in Section 17300 to Section 17306, inclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 330, Sec. 2.   (AB 282)   Effective September 19, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Protecting Elections from Armed Coercion and Extremism (PEACE) Act [18580. - 18582.]

18580.

For the purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Firearm” means a device designed to be used as a weapon, from which a projectile is expelled through a barrel by the force of an explosion or other form of combustion. It includes any firearm that is in the nature of an air gun, spring gun or pistol, or other weapon in which the propelling force is a spring, an elastic band, carbon dioxide, compressed or other gas or vapor, or air or compressed air, or is ignited by compressed air, and that ejects a bullet or missile smaller than three-eighths of an inch in diameter with sufficient force to injure a person that is so substantially similar in coloration and overall
 appearance to an existing firearm or weapon as to lead a reasonable person to perceive that the device is a firearm or weapon.

(b) “Imitation firearm” has the same meaning as in Section 16700 of the Penal Code.

(c) “Law enforcement officer” has the same meaning as in Section 13519.05 of the Penal Code. 

(d) “Officer holding an election or conducting a canvass” has the same meaning as in Section 18502.

(e) (1) “Open carry” has the same meaning as in Section 26350 of the Penal Code. 

(2) Notwithstanding Section 26350 of the Penal Code, this definition applies to any
 firearm or imitation firearm that is openly carried and applies to any firearm that is openly carried, regardless of whether the firearm is loaded.

(f) “Voting” includes any action necessary to make a vote effective in a primary, special, or general election, including registration or other action required by law as a prerequisite to voting, casting a ballot by any method permitted by law, and having such ballot counted properly and included in the appropriate totals of votes cast with respect to a candidate or measure for which votes are received in an election.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 533, Sec. 2.   (AB 2642)   Effective September 24, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

18581.

(a) A person shall not intimidate, threaten, or coerce, or attempt to intimidate, threaten, or coerce, any other person for any of the following:

(1) Voting or attempting to vote.

(2) Urging or aiding any person to vote or attempt to vote, whether as part of official election administration activity or otherwise.

(3) Exercising any powers or duties to administer elections, including counting votes, canvassing, and certifying an election in accordance with Division 15. 

(4) That other person’s status as a past or present participant in the administration of elections.

(b) (1) In any suit to enforce this section, a person who openly carries a firearm or imitation firearm while interacting with or observing any of the activities described in paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, or interacting with or observing a person due to their status described in paragraph (4), of subdivision (a) shall be presumed to have engaged in intimidation prohibited by this section in the absence of an affirmative showing to the contrary by a preponderance of the evidence.

(2) A law enforcement officer acting within the scope of their official duties is not subject to this presumption, but a court may nonetheless consider a law
 enforcement officer’s possession of a firearm in determining whether the officer violated subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 533, Sec. 2.   (AB 2642)   Effective September 24, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

18582.

(a) A person aggrieved by a violation of Section 18581 may enforce the provisions of this article in a suit at law or in equity, or both. A prevailing plaintiff in such an action shall recover reasonable attorney’s fees, reasonable expert fees, reasonable litigation expenses, and all such fees as are appropriate as part of the costs to be determined by a court of competent jurisdiction.

(b) An officer holding an election or conducting a canvass may enforce the provisions of this act and may institute an action for equitable relief on behalf of an aggrieved person who is in the officer’s jurisdiction or is eligible to vote in the officer’s jurisdiction.

(c) The Attorney General may enforce the provisions of this act and may institute for the state, or in the name of the state, an action for equitable relief, including an application for a temporary or permanent injunction, restraining order, or other order.

(d) A suit brought by an officer holding an election or conducting a canvass or the Attorney General under this section does not preclude a contemporaneous private suit by an aggrieved person to enforce the provisions of this article.

(e) In a suit to enforce the provisions of this article, a court may grant relief enjoining the use or carrying of firearms by a defendant beyond the areas defined in Article 3. This subdivision does not limit the court’s authority to grant
 any other just and equitable relief.

(f) In order to prevail in a suit to enforce the provisions of this article, a plaintiff need not prove that a defendant intended to intimidate, threaten, or coerce any person, except in order to prove an attempt to intimidate, threaten, or coerce. A court may nonetheless consider evidence of intent in determining the appropriate relief.

(g) The provisions of this article are cumulative and shall not be construed as restricting the application of any other law, including, but not limited to, the application of a criminal law to
 a person whose conduct violates Section 18581.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 533, Sec. 2.   (AB 2642)   Effective September 24, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Initiative, Referendum, and Recall [18600. - 18680.]



  ARTICLE 1. Improper Signature-Gathering Tactics [18600. - 18604.]

18600.

Every person is guilty of a misdemeanor who:

(a) Circulating, as principal or agent, or having charge or control of the circulation of, or obtaining signatures to, any state or local initiative, referendum or recall petition, intentionally misrepresents or intentionally makes any false statement concerning the contents, purport or effect of the petition, or the petition’s Official Top Funders disclosure required by Section 107, to any person who signs, or who desires to sign, or who is requested to sign, or who makes inquiries with reference to it, or to whom it is presented for the person’s signature.

(b) Willfully and knowingly circulates, publishes, or exhibits any false statement
 or misrepresentation concerning the contents, purport or effect of any state or local initiative, referendum, or recall petition, or the petition’s Official Top Funders disclosure required by Section 107, for the purpose of obtaining any signature to, or persuading or influencing any person to sign, that petition.

(c) Circulating, as principal or agent, or having charge or control of the circulation of, or obtaining signatures to, any state or local initiative, intentionally makes any false statement in response to any inquiry by any voter as to whether the person is a paid signature gatherer or a volunteer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 563, Sec. 8.   (SB 47)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

18601.

Any person working for the proponent or proponents of an initiative or referendum measure or recall petition who refuses to allow a prospective signer to read the measure or petition is guilty of a misdemeanor.

An arrest or conviction pursuant to this section shall not invalidate or otherwise affect the validity of any signature obtained by the person arrested or convicted.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

18602.

Any person working for the proponent or proponents of a statewide initiative or referendum measure who covers or otherwise obscures the summary of the measure prepared by the Attorney General from the view of a prospective signer is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

18603.

Every person who offers or gives money or other valuable consideration to another in exchange for his or her signature on a state, county, municipal, or district initiative, referendum, or recall petition is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 714, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

18604.

Upon conviction of a violation of any provision of this article, Article 2 (commencing with Section 18610), Article 3 (commencing with Section 18620), Article 5 (commencing with Section
 18640), Article 6 (commencing with Section 18650), or Article 7 (commencing with Section 18660), the court may order as a condition of probation that the convicted person be prohibited from receiving money or other valuable consideration for gathering signatures on an initiative, referendum, or recall petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 372, Sec. 2.   (AB 2101)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. False or Ineligible Signatures on Petition [18610. - 18614.]

18610.

Every person who solicits any circulator to affix to any initiative, referendum, or recall petition any false or forged signature, or to cause or permit a false or forged signature to be affixed, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

18611.

Every person is punishable by a fine not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for 16 months or two or three years, or in a county jail not exceeding one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment, who circulates or causes to be circulated any initiative, referendum, or recall petition, knowing it to contain false, forged, or fictitious names.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 89.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

18612.

Every person is guilty of a misdemeanor who knowingly signs his or her own name more than once to any initiative, referendum, or recall petition, or signs his or her name to that petition knowing himself or herself at the time of signing not to be qualified to sign it.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

18613.

Every person who subscribes to any initiative, referendum, or recall petition a fictitious name, or who subscribes thereto the name of another, or who causes another to subscribe such a name to that petition, is guilty of a felony and is punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for two, three, or four years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 90.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

18614.
